Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 17
YOUTH CHALLENGE CORPS PROGRAM

28-3-1701. Short title.

This part 17 shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Youth Challenge Corps Program Act".

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added, (HB 09-1280), ch. 384, p. 2083, § 1, effective August 5.

28-3-1702. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The need for educating at-risk or disruptive youth is well established;

Recognizing the need for special programs to address positive youth development, the United States congress authorized and appropriated moneys for the use of National Guard or other facilities and equipment for the provision of a program designed to improve the employment potential and life skills of eligible youth through National Guard youth challenge corps programs; and

An evaluation of similar programs for eligible youth operating in other states indicates that:

Eighty percent of the students accepted into these programs went on to graduate from the programs;

Eighty percent of the students in these programs were placed in schools or employed at the time of graduation from the programs;

Eighty percent of the students in these programs successfully completed a high school equivalency examination, either during the time in which they were participating in the programs or within one year after graduating from the programs; and

Less than one percent of the students who participated in these programs were incarcerated within one year after graduating from the programs.

Therefore, the general assembly hereby finds and declares that it would be in the best interest of the people of the state of Colorado to authorize the department to operate a youth challenge corps program and to take advantage of the opportunity to use National Guard or other facilities and equipment and any federal funding that may be available for such a program as authorized by federal law.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added, (HB 09-1280), ch. 384, p. 2083, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

(1)(c)(III) amended, (SB 14-058), ch. 102, p. 384, § 20, effective April 7.

28-3-1703. Definitions.

As used in this part 17, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Eligible youth" means a person who has voluntarily consented, with the written permission of his or her parent or guardian if the person is a minor, to participate in the National Guard youth challenge corps program and the United States congressional youth awards program and to act in accordance with program requirements. Additionally, an eligible youth shall be:

At least sixteen years of age but less than nineteen years of age;

A high school dropout, suspended or expelled from school, habitually truant, or otherwise habitually disruptive in school;

Economically and educationally disadvantaged;

Unemployed;

Drug-free;

Free of felony convictions or capital offenses, not indicted or charged with a crime, and not on parole or probation for anything other than juvenile status offenses; and

Physically and mentally capable of participating in the program with reasonable accommodations for physical or other disabilities.

"High school equivalency examination" means the state-board-approved battery of tests that are designed to measure the major outcomes and concepts generally associated with four years of high school education and that are administered at a testing center that has been approved by the department of education based on geographic need and testing volume.

"Program" means the youth challenge corps program authorized and described in section 28-3-1704.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added, (HB 09-1280), ch. 384, p. 2084, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

(2) amended, (SB 14-058), ch. 102, p. 384, § 21, effective April 7.

28-3-1704. Youth challenge corps program - authority - youth challenge corps program fund - creation.

The department is hereby authorized to operate a youth challenge corps program through the use of National Guard or other facilities and equipment for the purpose of providing eligible youth with a program to help them obtain a high school diploma or successfully complete a high school equivalency examination, increase their employment potential, and enhance their education and life skills. The program must be structured as a five-and-one-half-month residential phase that focuses on education and practical life skills, followed by a twelve-month, post-residential phase that involves skilled and trained mentors who support the program graduates. The department is not obligated to implement the program if adequate appropriations or federal or other moneys are not available.

The program shall comply with the criteria and conditions specified in a cooperative agreement entered into between the chief of the federal National Guard bureau and the state of Colorado.

The program must comply with any applicable state licensing requirements and must establish a collaborative partnership composed of a representative from, at a minimum, the following:

The state departments of education, public health and environment, labor, judicial, public safety, and human services;

A director of a county department of human or social services;

A school district;

A sheriff or police department; and

A community agency that serves youth and three appointed advisory youth members from the agency's service population.

The adjutant general of the department, or the adjutant general's designee, is directed to apply for any federal moneys that may be available to the state for the implementation and operation of the program.

The adjutant general of the department, or the adjutant general's designee, is authorized to accept on behalf of the state any gifts, grants, or donations from any private or public source for the purpose of implementing this part 17; except that the department shall not accept a gift, grant, or donation if it is subject to conditions that are inconsistent with this part 17 or any other law of the state.

All private and public moneys received through gifts, grants, or donations shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the youth challenge corps program fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this part 17 as the "fund". The moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department for the direct and indirect costs associated with the implementation and administration of this part 17. All investment earnings derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any moneys not appropriated shall remain in the fund and shall not be transferred or revert to the general fund at the end of any fiscal year.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added, (HB 09-1280), ch. 384, p. 2085, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-058), ch. 102, p. 385, § 22, effective April 7.

L. 2018:

IP(3) and (3)(b) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 453, § 141, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.